bg-BG: Мебели > Шкафове и съхранение > Дрешници: Детски дрешници; Вградени дрешници; Гардеробни стаи
zh-TW: 家具 > 櫥櫃和收納 > 衣櫥: 兒童衣櫃; 普通衣櫥; 步入式衣櫃
vi: Đồ gỗ > Tủ và đồ đựng > Tủ quần áo: Tủ quần áo trẻ em; Tủ quần áo thông thường; Tủ quần áo tích hợp phòng thay đồ
sl-SI: Pohištvo > Omare in shranjevanje > Omare: Otroške omare; Omare s prehodom; Prehodne garderobne omare
hu: Bútor > Szekrények és tárolók > Szekrények: Gyermekszekrények; Benyúlós szekrények; Besétálós szekrények
en: Furniture > Cabinets & Storage > Closets: Kids' Closets; Reach-In Closets; Walk-In Closets
de: Möbel > Schränke > Wandschränke: Kinder-Wandschränke; Einbauschränke; Begehbare Kleiderschränke
da: Møbler > Skabe og opbevaring > Skabe: Børneskabe; Reach-in-skabe; Walk-in-skabe
hr-HR: Namještaj > Elementi i pohrana > Ormari: Dječji ormari; Ugradbeni ormari; Walk-in ormari
ru: Мебель > Шкафы и мебель для хранения > Шкафы-кладовки: Детские шкафы-кладовки; Встраиваемые шкафы-кладовки; Шкафы для кладовых комнат
it: Arredamento > Armadietti e portaoggetti > Armadi: Armadi per bambini; Armadi accessibili; Cabine armadio
lt-LT: Baldai > Spintelės ir sandėliavimas > Integruotos spintos: Vaikiškos spintos; Neįeinamos spintos; Įeinamos spintos
fr: Meubles > Armoires et meubles de rangement > Placards: Placards pour enfants; Penderies; Dressings traversants
sk-SK: Nábytok > Úložné skrinky > Skrine: Detské skrine; Šatníkové skrine; Šatníky
pl: Meble > Szafy i przechowywanie > Garderoby: Garderoby dziecięce; Garderoby w zabudowie; Osobne garderoby
es: Mobiliario > Armarios y almacenamiento > Armarios: Armarios para niños; Armarios empotrados; Vestidores
sv: Möbler > Skåp och lagring > Garderober: Barnskåp; Reach-in-garderober; Walk-in-garderober
ko: 가구 > 캐비닛/수납장 > 붙박이장: 아동용 붙박이장; 일반 붙박이장; 드레스룸
pt-BR: Móveis > Armários e armazenamento > Closets: Closets infantis; Closets embutidos; Closets walk-in
pt-PT: Mobiliário > Armários e armazenamento > Armários: Armários infantis; Armários de alcance; Armários de entrar
th: เฟอร์นิเจอร์ > ตู้และที่จัดเก็บ > ตู้เสื้อผ้า: ตู้เสื้อผ้าเด็ก; ตู้เสื้อผ้าแบบเปิดและหยิบ; ตู้เสื้อผ้าแบบเดินเข้า
zh-CN: 家具 > 柜子/储物 > 衣柜: 儿童衣柜; 入墙式衣柜; 步入式衣柜
ja: 家具 > 収納家具 > クローゼット: キッズクローゼット; 壁面収納クローゼット; ウォークインクローゼット
nb: Møbler > Skap og lagring > Skap: Barnegarderobeskap; Reach-in-skap; Walk-In-skap
ro-RO: Mobilier > Dulăpioare și spații de depozitare > Dressinguri: Dressinguri pentru copii; Dressinguri tip șifonier; Dressinguri tip cameră
fi: Huonekalut > Kaapit ja säilytys > Kaapit: Lasten kaapit; Tavalliset kaapit; Vaatehuoneet
nl: Meubelen > Kasten en opbergmeubelen > Overige kasten: Kinderkasten; Reach-inkasten; Inloopkasten
cs: Nábytek > Skříně a úložné prostory > Šatníky a šatní skříně: Dětské šatníky; Vestavěné skříně; Šatny
tr: Mobilyalar > Dolaplar ve Saklama Mobilyaları > Dolaplar: Çocuk Gömme Dolapları; Gömme Dolap; Giyinme Odaları
el: Έπιπλα > Ντουλάπια & αποθήκευση > Ντουλάπες: Παιδικά ντουλάπια; Ντουλάπια με εύκολη πρόσβαση από μπροστά; Ντουλάπες με δυνατότητα εισόδου